Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-18] Notice of proceeding. If a
petition for the appointment of a guardian or issuance of a protective order is
brought in the State of Hawaii and it was not the respondent's home state on
the date the petition was filed, in addition to complying with the notice
requirements of the State of Hawaii, notice of the petition shall be given to
those persons who would be entitled to notice of the petition if a proceeding
were brought in the respondent's home state. The notice shall be given in the
same manner as notice is required to be given in the State of Hawaii. [L 2012,
c 236, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next